Idaho, session 2026, H0782.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 63-3024, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
63-3024. INDIVIDUALS' TAX AND TAX ON ESTATES AND TRUSTS. (1) For each
taxable year, a tax measured by Idaho taxable income as defined in this chap-
ter is hereby imposed upon every individual, trust, or estate required by
this chapter to file a return.
(2)(a) The tax imposed upon individuals, trusts, and estates shall be
computed at the rate of five and three-tenths percent (5.3%) five and
three hundred twenty-five thousandths percent (5.325%) of taxable in-
come over two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500).
(b) For taxpayers filing a joint return pursuant to the provisions of
section 63-3031, Idaho Code, the tax imposed shall be computed at the
rate of five and three-tenths percent (5.3%) five and three hundred
twenty-five thousandths percent (5.325%) of taxable income over five
thousand dollars ($5,000). For the purposes of this section, a return
of a surviving spouse, as defined in section 2(a) of the Internal Rev-
enue Code, and a head of household, as defined in section 2(b) of the
Internal Revenue Code, shall be treated as a joint return.
(3) For taxable year 2000 and each year thereafter, the state tax com-
mission shall prescribe a factor that shall be used to compute the Idaho in-
come tax thresholds provided in subsection (2) of this section. The factor
shall provide an adjustment to the Idaho tax thresholds so that inflation
will not result in a tax increase. The Idaho tax thresholds shall be adjusted
as follows: multiply the last threshold amount by the percentage (the con-
sumer price index for the calendar year immediately preceding the calendar
year to which the adjusted threshold amount will apply divided by the con-
sumer price index for calendar year 1998). For the purpose of this computa-
tion, the consumer price index for any calendar year is the average of the
consumer price index as of the close of the twelve (12) month period for the


immediately preceding calendar year, without regard to any subsequent ad-
justments, as adopted by the state tax commission. This adoption shall be
exempt from the provisions of chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code. The consumer
price index shall mean the consumer price index for all U.S. urban consumers
published by the United States department of labor. The state tax commission
shall annually include the factor as provided in this subsection to multiply
against Idaho taxable income using the thresholds in this section to arrive
at that year's Idaho taxable income for tax threshold purposes.
(4) In the case of a trust that is an electing small business trust as
defined in section 1361 of the Internal Revenue Code, the special rules for
taxation of such trusts contained in section 641 of the Internal Revenue Code
shall apply, except that the individual rate provided in subsection (2)(a)
of this section shall apply in computing tax due under this chapter.
(5) The state tax commission may promulgate rules defining the condi-
tions upon which such returns shall be filed.
SECTION 2. That Section 63-3025, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
63-3025. TAX ON CORPORATE INCOME. (1) For each taxable year, a tax is
hereby imposed on the Idaho taxable income of a corporation, other than an
S corporation, that transacts or is authorized to transact business in this
state or has income attributable to this state. The tax rate imposed by this
section shall be as follows:
(a) For each taxable year, commencing on and after January 1, 2001, the
tax imposed by this section shall be equal to seven and six-tenths per-
cent (7.6%) of Idaho taxable income.
(b) For each taxable year, commencing on and after January 1, 2012, the
tax imposed by this section is changed and shall be equal to seven and
four-tenths percent (7.4%) of Idaho taxable income.
(c) For each taxable year, commencing on and after January 1, 2018, the
tax imposed by this section is changed and shall be equal to six and nine
hundred twenty-five thousandths percent (6.925%) of Idaho taxable in-
come.
(d) For each taxable year, commencing on and after January 1, 2021,
the tax imposed by this section is changed and shall be equal to six and
five-tenths percent (6.5%) of Idaho taxable income.
(e) For each taxable year, commencing on and after January 1, 2022, the
tax imposed by this section is changed and shall be equal to six percent
(6%) of Idaho taxable income.
(f) For each taxable year, commencing on and after January 1, 2023, the
tax imposed by this section is changed and shall be equal to five and
eight-tenths percent (5.8%) of Idaho taxable income.
(g) For each taxable year, commencing on and after January 1, 2024, the
tax imposed by this section is changed and shall be equal to five and six
hundred ninety-five thousandths percent (5.695%) of Idaho taxable in-
come.
(h) For each taxable year, commencing on and after January 1, 2025, the
tax imposed by this section is changed and shall be equal to five and
three-tenths percent (5.3%) of Idaho taxable income.


(i) For each taxable year, commencing on and after January 1, 2026, the
tax imposed by this section is changed and shall be equal to five and
three hundred twenty-five thousandths percent (5.325%) of Idaho tax-
able income.
(2) In the case of an S corporation that is required to file a return un-
der section 63-3030, Idaho Code, a tax is hereby imposed at the rate provided
in subsection (1) of this section upon both:
(a) Net recognized built-in gain attributable to this state. The
amount of net recognized built-in gain attributable to this state shall
be computed in accordance with section 1374 of the Internal Revenue
Code subject to the apportionment and allocation provisions of section
63-3027, Idaho Code; and
(b) Excess net passive income attributable to this state. The amount of
excess net passive income attributable to this state shall be computed
in accordance with section 1375 of the Internal Revenue Code subject to
the apportionment and allocation provisions of section 63-3027, Idaho
Code.
(3) The tax imposed by subsection (1) or (2) of this section shall not be
less than twenty dollars ($20.00); provided that the twenty-dollar ($20.00)
minimum payment shall not be collected from nonproductive mining corpora-
tions.
(4) The tax imposed by this section shall not apply to corporations
taxed pursuant to the provisions of section 63-3025A, Idaho Code.
SECTION 3. That Section 63-3029L, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
63-3029L. CHILD TAX CREDIT. (1) For taxable years beginning on or af-
ter January 1, 2018, and before January 1, 2026, there shall be allowed to a
taxpayer a nonrefundable credit against the tax imposed by this chapter in
the amount of two hundred five dollars ($205) with respect to each qualifying
child of the taxpayer. For purposes of this section, the term "qualifying
child" has the meaning as defined in section 24(c) of the Internal Revenue
Code. In no event shall more than one (1) taxpayer be allowed this credit for
the same qualifying child. This credit is available only to Idaho residents.
Any part-year resident entitled to a credit under this section shall receive
a proportional credit reflecting the part of the year in which the part-year
resident was domiciled in Idaho.
(2) In the case of divorced parents or parents who do not live together,
if the qualifying child is in the custody of one or both of the child's par-
ents for more than one-half of a calendar year, such child is the qualifying
child of the custodial parent for the taxable year beginning during such cal-
endar year. However, the child may be the qualifying child of the noncusto-
dial parent if either of the following requirements are met:
(a) A court of competent jurisdiction has unconditionally awarded, in
writing, to the noncustodial parent the tax benefits associated with
the child pursuant to section 32-706, Idaho Code, and the noncustodial
parent attaches a copy of the court order to the noncustodial parent's
income tax return for the taxable year; or
(b) The custodial parent signs a written declaration that such custo-
dial parent will not claim the credit of this section with respect to


such child for any taxable year beginning in such calendar year and the
noncustodial parent attaches such written declaration to the noncusto-
dial parent's income tax return for the taxable year beginning during
such calendar year.
SECTION 4. That Section 63-3029N, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 5. That Section 67-1230, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-1230. IDAHO PARENTAL CHOICE TAX CREDIT ADVANCE PAYMENT FUND. (1)
There is hereby established in the state treasury the Idaho parental choice
tax credit advance payment fund, to be administered by the state tax commis-
sion.
(2) Moneys in the fund shall:
(a) Consist of the following:
(i) Legislative appropriations and transfers;
(ii) Donations and contributions made to the fund;
(iii) Reversions of unused, paid back, or recovered advance pay-
ment funds; and
(iv) Interest earned on idle moneys in the fund; and
(b) Be continuously appropriated to pay advance payments awarded un-
der the Idaho parental choice tax credit program established in section
63-3029N, Idaho Code.
(3) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the state
controller shall transfer the unobligated cash balance remaining in the
Idaho parental choice tax credit advance payment fund to the general fund on
July 1, 2026, or as soon thereafter as practicable but no later than December
1, 2026.
SECTION 6. That Section 67-1230, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 7. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, Sections 1, 2, 3, and 4 of this act shall be in full force
and effect on and after passage and approval, and retroactively to January
1, 2026; Section 5 of this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
passage and approval; and Section 6 of this act shall be in full force and
effect on January 1, 2027.